russian_feminine_nouns.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
        +N
        +Sg
        +Pl
        +Nom
        +Gen
        +Dat
        +Acc
        +Ins
        +Prep

LEXICON Root
        Nouns ;

LEXICON Nouns
берёза   NHardA ;
книга    NHardA ;
башня    NSoftJa ;
вишня    NSoftJa ;
кухня    NKitchen ;

LEXICON NHardA
+N:^   HardA ;

LEXICON NSoftJa
+N:^   SoftJa ;

LEXICON NKitchen
+N:^   KitchenJa ;

LEXICON HardA
+Sg+Nom:а    # ;
+Sg+Gen:ы    # ;
+Sg+Dat:е    # ;
+Sg+Acc:у    # ;
+Sg+Ins:ой   # ;
+Sg+Prep:е   # ;
+Pl+Nom:ы    # ;
+Pl+Gen:Z    # ;
+Pl+Dat:ам   # ;
+Pl+Acc:ы    # ;
+Pl+Ins:ами  # ;
+Pl+Prep:ах  # ;

LEXICON SoftJa
+Sg+Nom:я    # ;
+Sg+Gen:и    # ;
+Sg+Dat:е    # ;
+Sg+Acc:ю    # ;
+Sg+Ins:ей   # ;
+Sg+Prep:е   # ;
+Pl+Nom:и    # ;
+Pl+Gen:F    # ;
+Pl+Dat:ям   # ;
+Pl+Acc:и    # ;
+Pl+Ins:ями  # ;
+Pl+Prep:ях  # ;

LEXICON KitchenJa
+Sg+Nom:я    # ;
+Sg+Gen:и    # ;
+Sg+Dat:е    # ;
+Sg+Acc:ю    # ;
+Sg+Ins:ей   # ;
+Sg+Prep:е   # ;
+Pl+Nom:и    # ;
+Pl+Gen:ьK   # ;
+Pl+Dat:ям   # ;
+Pl+Acc:и    # ;
+Pl+Ins:ями  # ;
+Pl+Prep:ях  # ;

END
